Washington statutes.
RCW 18.92.250

Intent—Veterinary services—Low-income households.

The legislature recognizes that low-income households may not receive needed veterinary services for household pets. It is the intent of the legislature to allow qualified animal control agencies and humane societies to provide veterinary services to low-income members of our communities. It is not the intent of the legislature to allow these agencies to provide veterinary services to the public at large.

[ 2019 c 142 s 1; 2002 c 157 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 157: "This act takes effect July 1, 2003." [ 2002 c 157 s 3.]